Maryland, session 2025, HB0355.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Tax – General
10–209.
(a) In this section:
(1) [“employee retirement system” means a plan:
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb0355*

HOUSE BILL 355
(i) established and maintained by an employer for the benefit of its
employees; and
(ii) qualified under § 401(a), § 403, or § 457(b) of the Internal
Revenue Code; and
(2) “employee retirement system” does not include:
(i) an individual retirement account or annuity under § 408 of the
Internal Revenue Code;
(ii) a Roth individual retirement account under § 408A of the
Internal Revenue Code;
(iii) a rollover individual retirement account;
(iv) a simplified employee pension under Internal Revenue Code §
408(k); or
(v) an ineligible deferred compensation plan under § 457(f) of the
Internal Revenue Code.] “QUALIFIED RETIREMENT PLAN” MEANS:
(I) A RETIREMENT PLAN QUALIFIED UNDER § 401(A), § 403, OR
§ 457(B) OF THE INTERNAL REVENUE CODE;
(II) AN INDIVIDUAL RETIREMENT ACCOUNT OR ANNUITY UNDER
§ 408 OF THE INTERNAL REVENUE CODE;
(III) A ROTH INDIVIDUAL RETIREMENT ACCOUNT UNDER § 408A
OF THE INTERNAL REVENUE CODE;
(IV) A ROLLOVER INDIVIDUAL RETIREMENT ACCOUNT; OR
(V) A SIMPLIFIED EMPLOYEE PENSION UNDER § 408(K) OF THE
INTERNAL REVENUE CODE; AND
(2) “QUALIFIED RETIREMENT PLAN” DOES NOT INCLUDE AN
INELIGIBLE DEFERRED COMPENSATION PLAN UNDER § 457(F) OF THE INTERNAL
REVENUE CODE.
(b) Subject to subsections (C) AND (d) [and (e)] of this section, to determine
Maryland adjusted gross income, if, on the last day of the taxable year, a resident is at least
65 years old or is totally disabled or the resident’s spouse is totally disabled, or the resident
is 55 years old and is a retired forest ranger, park ranger, or wildlife ranger of the United

HOUSE BILL 355 3
States, the State, or a political subdivision of the State, an amount is subtracted from
federal adjusted gross income equal to [the lesser of]:
(1) [the cumulative or total annuity, pension, or endowment income from
an employee retirement system] 30% OF THE TOTAL INCOME FROM A QUALIFIED
RETIREMENT PLAN included in federal adjusted gross income FOR A TAXABLE YEAR
BEGINNING AFTER DECEMBER 31, 2024, BUT BEFORE JANUARY 1, 2026; [or]
[(2) the maximum annual benefit under the Social Security Act computed
under subsection (c) of this section, less any payment received as old age, survivors, or
disability benefits under the Social Security Act, the Railroad Retirement Act, or both.]
(2) 60% OF THE TOTAL INCOME FROM A QUALIFIED RETIREMENT
PLAN INCLUDED IN FEDERAL ADJUSTED GROSS INCOME FOR A TAXABLE YEAR
BEGINNING AFTER DECEMBER 31, 2025, BUT BEFORE JANUARY 1, 2027; AND
(3) 100% OF THE TOTAL INCOME FROM A QUALIFIED RETIREMENT
PLAN INCLUDED IN FEDERAL ADJUSTED GROSS INCOME FOR A TAXABLE YEAR
BEGINNING AFTER DECEMBER 31, 2026.
[(c) For purposes of subsection (b)(2) of this section, the Comptroller:
(1) shall determine the maximum annual benefit under the Social Security
Act allowed for an individual who retired at age 65 for the prior calendar year; and
(2) may allow the subtraction to the nearest $100.
(d) (1) Military retirement income that is included in the subtraction under §
10–207(q) of this subtitle may not be taken into account for purposes of the subtraction
under this section.
(2) Public safety employee retirement income that is included in the
subtraction under § 10–207(mm) of this subtitle may not be taken into account for purposes
of the subtraction under this section.]
(C) ANY INCOME THAT IS INCLUDED IN THE SUBTRACTIONS UNDER §
10–207 OF THIS SUBTITLE MAY NOT BE TAKEN INTO ACCOUNT FOR THE PURPOSES
OF THE SUBTRACTION UNDER THIS SECTION.
[(e)] (D) In the case of a retired forest ranger, park ranger, or wildlife ranger of
the United States, the State, or a political subdivision of the State, the amount included
under subsection [(b)(1)] (B) of this section is limited to the first $15,000 of retirement
income that is attributable to the resident’s employment as a forest ranger, park ranger, or
wildlife ranger of the United States, the State, or a political subdivision of the State unless:

HOUSE BILL 355
(1) the resident is at least 65 years old or is totally disabled; or
(2) the resident’s spouse is totally disabled.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2025, and shall be applicable to all taxable years beginning after December 31, 2024.